Mississippi, session 2026, SB3115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section, "county" means any county in the State of Mississippi that is wholly located within the metropolitan planning area of a metropolitan planning organization (MPO) designated in accordance with 23 USC § 134 and/or 49 USC § 5303. (2)  (a)  The board of supervisors of a county may impose upon all persons as a privilege for engaging or continuing in business or doing business within such county, a special sales tax at the rate of not more than one percent (1%) of the gross proceeds of sales or gross income of the business, as the case may be, derived from any of the activities taxed under Section 27-65-17(1)(a). (b) The tax levied under this section shall apply to every person making sales of tangible personal property or services within the county but shall not apply to: (i)  Sales exempted by Section 27-65-19, 27-65-101, 27-65-103, 27-65-105, 27-65-107, 27-65-109 or 27-65-111; (ii)  Gross proceeds of sales or gross income of restaurants derived from the sale of food and beverages; or (iii)  Gross proceeds of sales or gross income of hotels and motels derived from the sale of hotel rooms and motel rooms for lodging purposes. (3)  (a)  Before any tax authorized under this section may be imposed, the county board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the tax, setting forth the amount of the tax to be imposed, the purposes for which the revenue collected pursuant to the tax levy may be used and expended, the date upon which the tax shall become effective, the date upon which the tax shall be repealed, and calling for an election to be held on the question.  The date of the election shall be specified in the resolution and must be the date of a statewide general election.  Notice of the election shall be published once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the county, with the first publication of the notice to be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date fixed in the resolution for the election and the last publication to be made not more than seven (7) days before the election.  At the election, all qualified electors of the county may vote.  The ballots used at the election shall have printed thereon a brief description of the sales tax, the amount of the sales tax levy, a description of the purposes for which the tax revenue may be used and expended and the words "FOR THE LOCAL SALES TAX" and "AGAINST THE LOCAL SALES TAX" and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (√) opposite his choice on the proposition.  When the results of the election have been canvassed by the election commissioners of the county and certified by them to the county board of supervisors, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether at least sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors who voted in the election voted in favor of the tax.  If at least sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors who voted in the election voted in favor of the tax, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring the levy and collection of the tax provided in this section and shall set the first day of the second month following the date of such adoption as the effective date of the tax levy.  A certified copy of this resolution, together with the result of the election, shall be furnished to the department not less than thirty (30) days before the effective date of the levy. (b)  After the initial levy of the tax authorized under this section, the authority for the tax shall expire at the end of the month four (4) years from the month in which the electors previously approved the tax, unless the tax is reauthorized by at least sixty percent (60%) of the qualified electors in a new election held before the expiration of the tax.  The tax shall be subject to the same reapproval by the electors at each subsequent election.  Before each election, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to continue the levy of the tax authorized under this section and previously approved by the electors, and calling for an election to be held on the question of the continuation of the tax.  The date of the election shall be set in the resolution and, for the continuation of an existing tax, need not be the date of a statewide general election.  No later than the end of the month in which the electors reauthorize the tax, the governing authorities shall furnish to the department a certified copy of the resolution evidencing the continuation of the tax.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (b), the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply to each election and notice therefor. (4)  The revenue collected pursuant to the tax levy imposed under this section may be expended to pay the costs of road, street and bridge repair, reconstruction and resurfacing projects based on traffic patterns, need and usage, to pay the costs of water, sewer, drainage and stormwater projects, and to support law enforcement and fire service. (5)  (a)  The special sales tax authorized by this section shall be collected by the department, shall be accounted for separately from the amount of sales tax collected for the state in the county and shall be paid to the county.  The department may retain one percent (1%) of the proceeds of such tax for the purpose of defraying the costs incurred by the department in the collection of the tax.  Payments to the county shall be made by the department on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which the tax was collected.  However, if a county fails to comply with audit, reporting and/or report filing requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection and does not remedy such noncompliance within thirty (30) days after receiving written notice of noncompliance, the department shall withhold payments otherwise payable to the county under this paragraph (a) until the department receives written notice that the county has complied with such requirements. (b)  The proceeds of the special sales tax shall be placed into a special county fund apart from the county general fund and any other funds of the county, and shall be expended by the county solely for the purposes authorized in subsection (4) of this section.  The records reflecting the receipts and expenditures of the revenue from the special sales tax shall be audited annually by an independent certified public accountant.  The accountant shall make a report of his findings to the county board of supervisors and file a copy of his report with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives.  The audit shall be made and completed as soon as practical after the close of the fiscal year of the county, and expenses of the audit shall be paid from the funds derived by the county pursuant to this section. (c)  All provisions of this chapter applicable to filing of returns, discounts to the taxpayer, remittances to the department, enforced collection, rights of taxpayers, recovery of improper taxes, refunds of overpaid taxes or other provisions of law providing for imposition and collection of the state sales tax shall apply to the special sales tax authorized by this section, except where there is a conflict, in which case this section shall control.  Any damages, penalties or interest collected for the nonpayment of taxes imposed under this section, or for noncompliance with this section, shall be paid to the county on the same basis and in the same manner as the tax proceeds.  Any overpayment of tax for any reason that has been disbursed to a county or any payment of the tax to a county in error may be adjusted by the department on any subsequent payment to the county under this chapter.  The department may, from time to time, make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with this section as may be deemed necessary to administer this section, and such rules and regulations shall have the full force and effect of law. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 65, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.